Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6883XC (2) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 483A.8, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. A nonresident who purchases an antlered or any sex deer 3 hunting license pursuant to rules adopted pursuant to section 4 483A.1 , is required to purchase an antlerless deer only deer 5 hunting license at the same time only if the zone in which 6 the nonresident is purchasing the antlered or any sex deer 7 hunting license had antlerless deer only deer hunting licenses 8 available for purchase in the preceding year, as determined by 9 the commission , pursuant to rules adopted pursuant to section 10 483A.1 . 11